Washington statutes.
RCW 18.270.080

Appeals.

A person wishing to appeal a determination of infraction under this chapter must file an appeal within twenty days of the date of the notice of infraction in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2007 c 435 s 9.]